tests/N-pl.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../bua.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../bua.automorf.hfst


Tests:
  "т-д":
    поэт<n><pl><nom> : поэдүүд

  "Miscellaneous": 
    курс<n><pl><nom> : курснууд
    шонхо<n><pl><nom> : [шонхо, шонхонууд]
    кино<n><pl><nom> : [кино, кинонууд]
    кэксэ<n><pl><nom> : кэксэнууд
    дугы<n><pl><nom> : дугынууд
    эжы<n><pl><nom> : эжынүүд
    үнэн<n><pl><nom> : [үнэн, үнэнүүд]
    үһэн<n><pl><nom> : [үһэн, үһэнүүд]
    хүн<n><pl><nom> : хүнүүд
    хото<n><pl><nom> : хотонууд
    һагба<n><pl><nom> : һагбанууд
    һалхин<n><pl><nom> : [һалхин, һалхинууд]
    һара<n><pl><nom> : һаранууд
    заан<n><pl><nom> : заанууд
    жэмэс<n><pl><nom> : жэмэсүүд
    нюдэн<n><pl><nom> : нюдэнүүд
    газар<n><pl><nom> : газарнууд
    бэшэг<n><pl><nom> : бэшэгүүд
    бүлэ<n><pl><nom> : бүлэнүүд
    ваза<n><pl><nom> : вазанууд
